Hawaii statutes.
§183D-36 Carcass to be tagged. Any
licensee may possess, transport, or sell any game bird brought into the State
or raised in captivity within the State as set forth in this section. The
carcasses of the game birds may be possessed, transported, or sold at any time,
if tagged as directed by the department with an indestructible tag or seal to
be supplied by the department to the licensee upon payment of the actual cost.
[L 1985, c 174, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next